Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 523C.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsections: NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. âCommunicating in a verifiable mannerâ means communication by in-person delivery, first class mail, email, or, if there is an auditable record of the communication, by telephone or software application on an electronic device. NEW SUBSECTION . 1B. âGross considerationâ means the total value of a service contract without deducting any expenses or costs. NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. âPersonâ means an individual or a business entity. NEW SUBSECTION . 12A. âService contract holderâ means the original purchaser of a service contract or the successor in interest or transferee entitled to services under the service contract. NEW SUBSECTION . 12B. âSubstitute partâ means a part that is not issued by the original part manufacturer, including but not limited to a remanufactured part, an aftermarket part, and a part obtained from a salvage yard. House File 2756, p. 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 12C. âSupport servicesâ means a person that provides services that support, or a person that works under the direction of, a licensed service company in connection with the issuance, offer for sale, sale, or administration of a service contract in this state, including but not limited to a person that provides marketing, administrative, or technical support to a service company. Sec. 2. Section 523C.1, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4. âMotor vehicleâ means any vehicle that is self-propelled vehicle and subject to registration under chapter 321 . Sec. 3. Section 523C.1, subsection 10, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10. âResidential service contractâ means a contract or agreement between a residential customer and a service company which undertakes, for a predetermined fee and for any period of time, to service, maintain, repair, replace, or indemnify expenses for all or any part of the operational or structural components, appliances, or electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating, cooling, or air-conditioning systems of residential property in the state which fails due to normal wear or tear or inherent defect . âResidential service contractâ also includes a contract which provides for the service, repair, replacement, or maintenance of property for , or damage resulting from power surges, roof leakage, and or accidental damage. Sec. 4. Section 523C.2, Code 2026, is amended by striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 523C.2 License required. 1. A person shall not, directly or indirectly, issue, offer for sale, or sell, a motor vehicle service contract or residential service contract in this state unless the person is licensed under this chapter. 2. This chapter shall not apply to any person that provides support services. A service company that utilizes support services shall ensure the support servicesâ compliance with the issuance, offer for sale, or sale of a service contract under this chapter. 3. A service company shall maintain a license for the duration of time that the service company is contractually House File 2756, p. 3 obligated to a service contract holder under the terms of a service contract, unless otherwise ordered by the commissioner after a hearing conducted pursuant to chapter 17A. 4. A service company shall report to the commissioner within thirty calendar days any material change to the information submitted by the service company in the service companyâs initial license application, or license renewal application, including a change in the service companyâs contact information, ownership, officers, or directors directly responsible for the service companyâs service contract business, or any other change that substantially affects the service companyâs operations in the state. 5. A service company shall report to the commissioner any final disposition of an administrative action taken against the service company related to the service companyâs service contract business in another jurisdiction within thirty calendar days of final disposition of the administrative action. The report must include a copy of the order, consent to the order, and other relevant legal documents. 6. Within thirty calendar days of the initial pretrial hearing date, a service company shall report to the commissioner a criminal prosecution in any jurisdiction of an owner with more than a ten percent ownership stake, an officer, or a director directly responsible for the service contract business of the service company, for an offense involving dishonesty or a false statement including but not limited to fraud, theft, misappropriation of funds, falsification of documents, deceptive acts or practices, or other related offenses. The report must include a copy of the initial complaint filed, the order resulting from the hearing, and any other relevant legal documents. 7. A residential service contract and a motor vehicle service contract shall not be considered insurance. Sec. 5. Section 523C.3, Code 2026, is amended by striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 523C.3 Application for license. 1. Application for a license as a service company shall be filed with the commissioner on a form approved by the commissioner and must include all of the following information: House File 2756, p. 4 a. The name and principal address of the applicant. b. The state of incorporation of the applicant. c. The name and address of the applicantâs registered agent for service of process in Iowa. d. The legal name of all of the following: (1) Each owner of the service company that has a greater than ten percent ownership stake in the service company. (2) Each officer of the service company. (3) Each director directly responsible for the business of the service company. e. Evidence that the applicant has obtained any necessary authority from the secretary of state to transact business in this state. An applicant whose home state is not this state shall provide a certification, dated not more than thirty calendar days after the date of submission of an application, from the applicantâs home state that certifies the applicant is in good standing in the applicantâs home state. f. Evidence of compliance with section 523C.5. g. A copy of each motor vehicle service contract form to be used, issued, or offered for sale in this state by the service company. h. A copy of each residential service contract form to be used, issued, or offered for sale in this state by the service company. i. A national association of insurance commissionersâ biographical affidavit for the chief executive officer and chief financial officer of the service company, or for the individuals in equivalent positions. j. A list of any disciplinary actions taken against the service company, or any of the service companyâs owners who have an ownership stake in the service company of more than ten percent, officers, or directors directly responsible for the providerâs service contract business, in the immediately preceding five consecutive years by a regulatory agency or state attorney general in any jurisdiction. 2. The application must be accompanied by a license fee in the amount of five hundred dollars. 3. If the application for a service company license contains the information under subsection 1, is accompanied by the House File 2756, p. 5 fees under subsection 2, includes any additional information requested by the commissioner to verify the information in the application, and the commissioner has not denied the application pursuant to section 523C.9, the commissioner shall issue the license to the applicant. 4. Fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the service company oversight fund as provided in section 523C.24. Sec. 6. Section 523C.4, Code 2026, is amended by striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 523C.4 License expiration and renewal. 1. A license issued under this chapter shall be valid for a period of one year and shall be renewed annually on or before August 31. A licensee must apply for renewal at least ninety calendar days prior to the license expiration date. A license that is not renewed prior to the expiration date may be deemed expired. 2. An application for license renewal must include the information required for an initial license as described in section 523C.3, subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ through âfâ , and a list of each service contract form the service company continues to use, offer for sale, or issue in the state, including the service contract form name, number, and the date the form was last revised. 3. The license renewal application must be accompanied by all of the following: a. A license renewal fee in the amount of two hundred dollars. b. A fee in the amount of three percent of the aggregate amount of payments the service company received for the sale or issuance of residential service contracts in this state, less any refunds issued, during the immediately preceding calendar year, provided that such fee must be no greater than fifty thousand dollars. c. In a format prescribed by the commissioner, information regarding service contracts in this state for the service company in the immediately preceding calendar year itemized as follows: (1) The number of motor vehicle service contracts issued. House File 2756, p. 6 (2) The number of residential service contracts issued. (3) The number of motor vehicle service contracts canceled. (4) The number of residential service contracts canceled. (5) The number of motor vehicle service contracts that expired. (6) The number of residential service contracts that expired. (7) The number of motor vehicle service contracts in effect on December 31 of the immediately preceding calendar year. (8) The number of residential service contracts in effect on December 31 of the immediately preceding calendar year. (9) The total dollar amount of motor vehicle service contract fees received by the service company. (10) The total dollar amount of residential service contract fees received by the service company. 4. If the license renewal application complies with this section, includes any additional information requested by the commissioner to verify the information in the application, and the commissioner has not refused to renew the license pursuant to section 523C.9, the commissioner shall renew the license. If the commissioner refuses renewal of a license pursuant to section 523C.9, the refusal shall be in writing setting forth the grounds for the refusal. 5. If a service company submits a license renewal application after the license has expired, the service company shall pay a reinstatement fee of eight hundred dollars, and the applicable fees pursuant to subsection 3. 6. A service company whose license has expired shall not offer, extend, or renew a service contract until the service companyâs license has been renewed or the service company has been issued a new license. Sec. 7. Section 523C.7, Code 2026, is amended by striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 523C.7 Disclosure to service contract holders ââ contract form ââ required provisions. 1. A service contract shall not be issued, sold, or offered for sale in this state unless the service company does all of the following: a. Provides a receipt for the purchase of the service House File 2756, p. 7 contract to the service contract holder. b. Provides a complete sample copy of the service contract to the consumer prior to purchase. A service company may comply with this paragraph by providing the consumer with a complete electronic sample copy of the service contract, or directing the consumer to a complete sample copy of the service contract on an internet site. c. Provides a fully executed paper or electronic copy of the service contract to the service contract holder within ten business days of the date the service contract holder purchased the service contract. A paper copy of the executed service contract shall be provided to the service contract holder upon request of the service contract holder at the expense of the service company. 2. A service contract issued, sold, or offered for sale in the state must comply with all of the following, as applicable: a. A service contract must be written in clear, understandable language in at least eight point type. b. (1) A service contract insured under a reimbursement insurance policy as provided in section 523C.5, subsection 1, must include a statement in substantially the following form: Obligations of the service company under this service contract are guaranteed under a reimbursement insurance policy. If the service company fails to pay or provide service on a claim within sixty days after proof of loss has been filed with the service company, the service contract holder is entitled to make a claim directly against the reimbursement insurance policy. (2) A service contract insured under a reimbursement insurance policy must conspicuously state the name and address of the issuer of the reimbursement insurance policy for that service contract. A claim against a reimbursement insurance policy must also include a claim for return of any refund due in accordance with paragraphs âmâ and ânâ . c. A service contract not insured under a reimbursement insurance policy must contain a statement in substantially the following form: Obligations of the service company under this service contract are backed by the full faith and credit of the service company House File 2756, p. 8 and are not guaranteed under a reimbursement insurance policy. d. A service contract must state the name and address of the service company obligated to perform services under the contract, and must conspicuously identify the service company, any third-party administrator, and the service contract holder to the extent that the name and address of the service contract holder has been furnished. The identities of such parties shall not be required to be printed on the contract in advance and may be added to the contract at the time of sale. e. A service contract must clearly state the total purchase price of the service contract and the terms under which the service contract is sold. The total purchase price shall not be required to be printed on the contract in advance and may be added to the contract at the time of sale. f. If prior approval of repair work is required, a service contract must conspicuously describe the procedure for obtaining prior approval and for making a claim, including a toll-free telephone number for claim service, and the procedure for obtaining emergency repairs performed outside of normal business hours. g. A service contract must clearly state any waiting period applicable to coverage under the service contract. h. A service contract must clearly state the existence of any deductible amount. i. A service contract must specify the merchandise or services, or both, to be provided and any limitations, exceptions, or exclusions. j. A service contract must clearly state the conditions on which the use of substitute parts or services will be allowed. Such conditions must comply with applicable state and federal laws. k. A service contract must clearly state any terms, restrictions, or conditions governing the transferability of the service contract. l. A service contract must clearly state the instructions for cancellation of the service contract by the service contract holder. Cancellation instructions must include the phone number, email address, or mailing address necessary for the cancellation of the service contract. A service company House File 2756, p. 9 shall accept cancellation of a service contract from a service contract holder by one or more of the following methods: (1) Telephone. (2) Email. (3) The method utilized by the service company to enter into the service contract with the service contract holder. m. A service contract must clearly state the terms and conditions governing the cancellation of the contract prior to the termination or expiration date of the contract by the service company or the service contract holder. If the service company cancels the contract, the service company shall mail a written notice of termination to the service contract holder at least fifteen calendar days before the date of the termination. Prior notice of cancellation by the service company shall not be required if the reason for cancellation is nonpayment of the purchase price, a material misrepresentation by the service contract holder to the service company or the support services for the service company, or a substantial breach of duty by the service contract holder relating to the covered product or use of the covered product. The notice of cancellation must state the effective date of the cancellation and the reason for the cancellation. If a service contract is canceled by the service company for any reason other than nonpayment of the purchase price, the service company shall refund the service contract holder in an amount equal to one hundred percent of the unearned purchase price paid, calculated on a pro rata basis based upon elapsed time or mileage, less any claims paid. The service company may also charge a reasonable administrative fee in an amount no greater than ten percent of the total purchase price. A penalty of ten percent of the original dollar amount of the refund shall be added to the refund each month if the refund is not paid to the service contract holder within thirty calendar days. n. (1) A service contract must permit the original service contract holder who purchased the contract to cancel the service contract within at least thirty calendar days of the effective date of the service contract, provided no claims have been paid under the service contract, or within a longer period of time as permitted under the service contract. If House File 2756, p. 10 a claim has not been paid under the service contract prior to cancellation by the service contract holder, the service contract is void and the full purchase price of the service contract shall be refunded to the service contract holder. A penalty of ten percent of the original dollar amount of the refund shall be added to the refund each month if the refund is not paid to the service contract holder within thirty calendar days, unless the service contract holder fails to provide the information required by the service contract to complete the cancellation. (2) If the service contract holder cancels the service contract in violation of subparagraph (1), the service company shall refund the service contract holder an amount equal to one hundred percent of the unearned purchase price paid, calculated on a pro rata basis based upon elapsed time or mileage, less any claims paid. The service company may also charge a reasonable administrative fee in an amount no greater than ten percent of the total purchase price. A penalty of ten percent of the original dollar amount of the refund shall be added to a refund each month if the refund is not paid to the service contract holder within thirty calendar days of the service contract cancellation request, unless the service contract holder fails to provide the information required in the service contract to complete the cancellation. o. A service contract must set forth all obligations and duties of the service contract holder, including but not limited to the duty to protect against any further damage, and the obligation to follow an ownerâs manual and to perform, or have performed, all required service or maintenance. p. A service contract must clearly state if the contract covers or excludes consequential damages and preexisting conditions, if applicable. A service contract may, but is not required to, cover damage resulting from rust, corrosion, or damage caused by a part or system not covered under the service contract. q. A service contract must clearly state the service call fee, if any, charged to the service contract holder. r. A service contract must state the name and address of the commissioner, the current toll-free telephone number of the House File 2756, p. 11 division, and a statement that a consumer may file a complaint with the division, including by filing a complaint on the divisionâs internet site. s. A service contract must state that if the claim covered under a residential service contract relates to the total loss of heating, cooling, or plumbing, or substantial loss of electrical service, and the claim being made by the service contract holder is essential to the health and safety of the service contract holder or, if applicable, the service contract holderâs family, the service company shall ensure all of the following: (1) Repair or replacement of the essential good commences within forty-eight hours after the report of the claim, and is completed as soon as reasonably practicable. (2) Notice is provided to the service contract holder if a repair cannot practicably be completed within three calendar days after the report of the claim. The service company shall provide a status report to the service contract holder by communicating in a verifiable manner as soon as practicable, but no later than three calendar days after the date of the report of the claim. The status report must include all of the following: (a) A list of all required repairs, replacements, or services, and the estimated cost to the service contract holder if known. (b) The primary reason the required repair, replacement, or service will take longer than three calendar days, including the status of all parts required for the repair, replacement, or service. (c) The current estimated length of time to complete the repair, replacement, or service. (d) The telephone number of the service company in the event the service contract holder or the commissioner wants to make an inquiry concerning the claim, and a commitment by the service company to respond to an inquiry no later than one business day after the date the inquiry is received. Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 523C.8 Service contract forms ââ fees. 1. A service company shall file with the division an accurate copy of each service contract form prior to using the House File 2756, p. 12 service contract form for the sale of a service contract in this state. 2. At the time of filing a new or modified motor vehicle service contract form with the division a service company shall pay a fee in the amount of thirty-five dollars for a new or modified motor vehicle service contract form filed with the division. If a service company files a modified motor vehicle service contract form, and the only modification to the motor vehicle service contract form is information required by section 523C.7, subsection 2, paragraph ârâ , the service company shall not be required to pay a fee for filing the modified motor vehicle service contract form. 3. Notwithstanding section 523C.7, a service company may continue to use a service contract form that is noncompliant with this chapter until January 1, 2028, provided no changes are made to the service contract form and the service contract form was filed with the division before January 1, 2027. Sec. 9. Section 523C.9, Code 2026, is amended by striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 523C.9 License denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation. 1. The commissioner may, at the commissionerâs discretion and without advance notice or hearing, immediately suspend a service companyâs license if the commissioner finds that any of the following are true: a. The service company is insolvent or impaired. b. A proceeding for receivership, conservatorship, rehabilitation, or other delinquency proceeding regarding the service company has been commenced in any state. c. The financial condition or business practices of the service company otherwise pose an imminent threat to the public health, safety, or welfare of the residents of this state. 2. The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of, deny an application for a license from, or refuse to renew the license of, a service company, or may levy a civil penalty as provided in section 523C.13 against a service company, for any of the following reasons: a. The service company violated this chapter, a lawful order, regulation, or subpoena issued by the commissioner or a regulatory authority of another state. House File 2756, p. 13 b. The service company failed to pay a final judgment rendered against the service company in this state within sixty calendar days after the date the judgment became final. c. The service company, without just cause, refused to perform, or negligently or incompetently performed, a service required to be performed under the service companyâs service contracts and the refusal, or negligent or incompetent performance, has occurred with such frequency as determined by the commissioner, as to indicate the general business practices of the service company. d. The service company violated section 523C.13. e. The service company failed to demonstrate financial responsibility pursuant to section 523C.5, if applicable. f. The service company failed to maintain a corporate certificate of good standing pursuant to section 523C.3, subsection 1. g. The service company provided incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the service companyâs license application. h. The service company obtained or attempted to obtain a license through misrepresentation or fraud. i. The service company improperly withheld, misappropriated, or converted any money or property received in the course of business as a service company. j. The service company intentionally misrepresented the terms of an actual or proposed service contract. k. Within the immediately preceding ten consecutive years, an owner who has an ownership stake in the service company of more than ten percent, an officer, or a director directly responsible for the business of the service company has been convicted of a criminal offense involving any aspect of a business involving securities, commodities, investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance. l. An owner who has an ownership stake in the service company of more than ten percent, an officer, or a director directly responsible for the business of the service company has been convicted of a criminal offense involving dishonesty or a false statement, including but not limited to fraud, theft, misappropriation of funds, falsification of documents, House File 2756, p. 14 deceptive acts or practices, or other related offenses. m. The service company admitted to committing, or was found to have committed, any unfair trade practice or fraud. n. The service company used fraudulent, coercive, or dishonest practices, or demonstrated incompetence, untrustworthiness, or financial irresponsibility, in conducting business in this state or any other state. o. The service company had a service company license or its equivalent, denied, suspended, or revoked in any other state, province, district, or territory. p. The service company failed, or refused, to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the commissioner of insurance. q. The commissioner has found the service company to be incompetent, untrustworthy, financially irresponsible, or not of good personal or business reputation. r. The service company has refused to be examined or to produce the service companyâs accounts, records, or files for examination, or any individual responsible for the conduct of the affairs of the service company has refused to provide information with respect to the service companyâs affairs or has refused to perform any other legal obligation as to an examination. s. The service company has engaged, directly or indirectly, in an unfair method of competition or unfair or deceptive act or practice. 3. If the commissioner suspends or revokes the license of, denies the application for licensure of, or refuses to renew the license of, a service company pursuant to this section, the commissioner shall notify the service company in writing and provide the reason for the suspension, revocation, denial, or nonrenewal. The licensee or applicant may request a hearing on the suspension, revocation, nonrenewal, or denial, and a hearing shall be conducted according to chapter 17A. Sec. 10. Section 523C.13, Code 2026, is amended by striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 523C.13 Prohibited acts or practices ââ penalty ââ violations ââ contracts voided. 1. A service company, or the service companyâs support services, that offers service contracts for sale in this state House File 2756, p. 15 shall not, directly or indirectly, represent in any manner, whether by written solicitation or telemarketing, a false, deceptive, or misleading statement with respect to any of the following: a. The service companyâs affiliation with a motor vehicle manufacturer or importer. b. The validity or expiration of a warranty. c. A motor vehicle service contract holderâs coverage under a motor vehicle service contract, including statements suggesting that the service contract holder must purchase a new service contract in order to maintain coverage under the existing service contract or warranty. d. Descriptions of the service contract as a âpolicyâ. 2. A licensed service company which offers service contracts for sale in this state shall not, directly or indirectly, do any of the following: a. Fail to attempt, in good faith, to effectuate the prompt, fair, and equitable resolution of a claim made under a service contract. b. Create or use any advertising that does not include the name of the licensed service company or direct consumers to an internet site where the name of the licensed service company can be found. c. Use any method of marketing that may induce the purchase of a service contract through force, fear, or threats, whether explicit or implied. d. Create or use any service contract marketing materials that contain incorrect or misleading information. e. Use, offer for sale, or issue in this state a service contract form that has not been submitted as part of a license application pursuant to section 523C.3, as part of a license application renewal pursuant to section 523C.4, or submitted to the division during the service companyâs current license period. 3. The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A that regulate service contracts to prohibit misrepresentation, false advertising, defamation, boycotts, coercion, intimidation, false statements and entries, and unfair discrimination or practices. House File 2756, p. 16 4. After a hearing, if the commissioner finds that a person violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter, the commissioner may order the person to cease and desist from the violation and may order the person to pay a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate of ten thousand dollars, unless the person knew or reasonably should have known the person was in violation of this chapter, in which case the civil penalty shall be no more than five thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate of fifty thousand dollars in any one consecutive six-month period. If the commissioner finds a violation of this chapter was directed, encouraged, condoned, ignored, or ratified by the employer of such person or by a service company, the commissioner shall assess a penalty to the employer or service company. Any civil penalties collected under this subsection shall be deposited as provided in section 505.7. 5. A violation of this section or section 523C.7 constitutes an unlawful practice pursuant to section 714.16. 6. A service contract issued or sold in this state by a service company that was not licensed as a service company at the time the service contract was issued or sold shall be void and unenforceable. Sec. 11. Section 523C.22, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 523C.22 Claim procedures. A licensed service company shall promptly provide a written explanation to the service contract holder, describing the reasons for denying a claim or for the offer of a compromise settlement, based on all relevant facts or legal requirements and referring to applicable provisions of the service contract. The written explanation must include the process for filing a complaint with the division, including the divisionâs internet site for accessing the complaint form. Sec. 12. Section 523C.23, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) During an investigation or proceeding conducted under this chapter, the commissioner or any designee of the commissioner may administer oaths and House File 2756, p. 17 affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel witnessesâ attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any records which the commissioner deems relevant or material to the investigation or proceeding. NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) Conduct an investigation of a suspected violation of this chapter and enforce the provisions of, and impose any penalty or remedy authorized by, this chapter against any person who is under investigation for, or charged with, a violation of this chapter even if the personâs license has been surrendered or has lapsed by operation of law. Sec. 13. Section 523C.23, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 14. Section 523C.23, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 523C.25 Confidentiality. 1. Notwithstanding chapter 22, the commissioner shall maintain the confidentiality of information submitted to the division or obtained by the division in the course of an investigation, examination, or inquiry pursuant to this chapter or the commissionerâs licensing authority, including all notes, work papers, or other documents. Information obtained by the commissioner in the course of investigating a complaint or inquiry may, at the discretion of the commissioner, be provided to the service company that is the subject of the complaint or inquiry and the consumer who filed the complaint or inquiry, without waiving the confidentiality afforded to the commissioner or to any other person by this section. The commissioner may disclose or release information that is otherwise confidential under this subsection in the course of an administrative or judicial proceeding. 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, if the commissioner determines that it is necessary in the public interest, the commissioner may share information submitted to the division or obtained by the division in the course of an investigation, examination, or inquiry pursuant to this chapter with other regulatory authorities or government agencies. 3. Notwithstanding subsection 1, if the commissioner determines that it is necessary in the public interest, the commissioner may publish service company-related data or House File 2756, p. 18 information submitted to the division or obtained by the division in the course of an investigation, examination, or inquiry pursuant to this chapter. Such information may be redacted so that neither personally identifiable information nor service company identifiable information is made available. 4. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the commissioner may publish on the divisionâs internet site the name, physical address, telephone number, and license status of any service company submitted to the division or obtained by the division in the course of an investigation, examination, or inquiry pursuant to this chapter. Sec. 16. Section 714.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . t. It is an unlawful practice for a person to violate section 523C.7 or 523C.13. Sec. 17. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2756, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor